Utah statutes.
4-22-7.   Assessment imposed on sale of milk or cream produced, sold, or
contracted for sale in state -- Time of assessment -- Collection by dealer or
producer-handler -- Penalty for delinquent payment or collection -- Statement
to be given to producer.
(1)  An assessment of 10 cents is imposed upon each 100 pounds of milk or
cream produced and sold, or contracted for sale, through commercial channels
in this state.
(2)  The assessment shall be:
(a)  based upon daily or monthly settlements; and
(b)  due at a time set by the commission, which may not be later than the last
day of the month next succeeding the month of sale.
(3) (a)  The assessment shall be:
(i)  assessed against the producer at the time the milk or milk fat is
delivered for sale;
(ii)  deducted from the sales price; and
(iii)  collected by the dealer or producer-handler.
(b)  The proceeds of the assessment shall be paid directly to the commission
who shall issue a receipt to the dealer or producer-handler.
(c)  If a dealer or producer-handler fails to remit the proceeds of the
assessment or deduct the assessment on time, a penalty equal to 10% of the
amount due shall be added to the assessment.
(4) (a)  At the time of payment of the assessment, the dealer or producer-
handler shall deliver a statement to the producer calculating the assessment.
(b) The commission may require other relevant information to be included in
the statement.
(5)  If the mandatory assessment required by the Dairy and Tobacco Adjustment
Act of 1983, Pub. L. No. 98-180, 97 Stat. 1128 (1150.152), is abolished, a
producer who objects to payment of the assessment imposed under this section,
may, by January 31, submit a written request to the commission for a refund of
the amount of the assessment the producer paid during the previous year.
